Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.290

Contracts between board of regents of state universities and hospital board of trustees for medical services and teaching and research activities.

Whenever any county, or any county and city jointly, or two or more counties jointly, establish a hospital under the provisions of this chapter, the board of trustees of the hospital is empowered, with the approval of the county legislative authority, to enter into a contract with the board of regents of a state university to provide hospital services, including management under the direction of a hospital administrator for the hospital, to provide for the rendering of medical services in connection with the hospital and to provide for the conduct of teaching and research activities by the university in connection with the hospital. Any such board of regents is empowered to enter into such a contract, to provide such hospital services, and to provide for the rendition of such medical services and for the carrying on of teaching and research in connection with such a hospital. If such a contract is entered into, the provisions of RCW 36.62.210 and 36.62.230 shall not be applicable during the term of the contract and all of the powers, duties and functions vested in the superintendent in this chapter shall be vested in the board of trustees. The board of trustees shall provide for such conditions and controls in the contract as it shall deem to be in the community interest.

[ 1984 c 26 s 22; 1967 ex.s. c 36 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1967 ex.s. c 36: "This act shall take effect on July 1, 1967." [ 1967 ex.s. c 36 s 4.]